Missouri, session 2026, HB2445.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.504, to read as follows:
9.504. April fifth each year is hereby designated as "Racquetball Day" in
2 Missouri, in honor of Kirkwood Racquetball, USA Racquetball's four-time consecutive
3 high school national champions. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate
4 in appropriate events and activities to learn more about the sport of racquetball and
5 celebrate the successes of Kirkwood Racquetball.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.